en: Tab style: Alphabetical; Blank; Numbered; Pre-printed; Other
sk-SK: Štýl štítku: Abecedný; Prázdny; Číslovaný; Predtlačené; Iné
ru: Тип разделителя: По алфавиту; Пустой; Пронумерованный; Предварительно напечатанный; Другое
hr-HR: Izgled kartica: Abecedno; Prazna; Numerirana; S tiskom; Ostalo
fi: Välilehden tyyli: Aakkosellinen; Tyhjä; Numeroitu; Esipainettu; Muu
de: Reiterstil: Alphabetisch; Leer; Nummeriert; Vorgedruckt; Sonstiges
pt-BR: Estilo de guia: Alfabético; Em branco; Numerado; Pré-impressos; Outro
fr: Style de séparateur: Alphabétique; Vide; Numéroté; Pré-imprimé; Autre
vi: Kiểu nhãn: Theo bảng chữ cái; Trống rỗng; Đánh số; In sẵn; Khác
pl: Styl zakładki: Alfabetycznie; Puste; Numerowane; Wstępnie wydrukowane; Inne
pt-PT: Estilo do separador: Alfabético; Em branco; Numerado; Pré-impresso; Outro
cs: Styl karty: Abecední; Prázdný; Číslování; Předtištěný; Jiné
th: สไตล์แท็บ: ตัวอักษร; ว่างเปล่า; มีหมายเลข; พิมพ์ล่วงหน้า; อื่นๆ
ja: タブスタイル: アルファベット順; 空白; ナンバー入り; プリント済み; その他
lt-LT: Skyriklių stilius: Abėcėlinis; Tuščias; Numeruotas; Iš anksto atspausdintas; Kita
da: Fanestil: Alfabetisk; Blank; Nummereret; Fortrykt; Andet
tr: Tırnak Stili: Alfabetik; Boş; Sayılı; Önceden basılmış; Diğer
hu: Lap stílusa: Betűrendes; Üres; Számozott; Előre nyomtatott; Egyéb
nl: Tabbladstijl: Alfabetisch; Blanco; Genummerd; Voorbedrukt; Andere
el: Στυλ καρτέλας: Αλφαβητική; Κενή; Αριθμημένη; Προεκτυπωμένο; Άλλο
zh-TW: 分頁樣式: 按字母順序; 空白; 編號; 預印; 其他
sv: Flikstil: Alfabetisk; Tom; Numrerad; Förtryckt; Övrigt
ko: 탭 스타일: 알파벳순; 공백; 번호 매기기; 사전 인쇄; 기타
it: Stile della scheda: Alfabetico; Vuoto; Numerato; Prestampato; Altro
nb: Fanestil: Alfabetisk; Tom; Nummerert; Fortrykt; Annet
es: Estilo de pestaña: Alfabético; En blanco; Numerado; Preimpreso; Otros
bg-BG: Стил на раздела: По азбучен ред; Празен; Номериран; Предварително отпечатан; Други
sl-SI: Slog zavihka: Abecedni; Prazen; Oštevilčen; Prednatisnjeno; Drugo
ro-RO: Tip separator: Alfabetic; Gol; Numerotat; Pre-mprimat; Altele
zh-CN: 标签款式: 按字母顺序; 空白; 有编号; 预打印; 其他